Utah statutes.
63B-21-201.   Authorizations to design and construct capital facilities using institutional or agency funds.

(1)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  the University of Utah may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use $37,400,000 in donations and institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a Dental School Building with up to 70,200 new square feet;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance costs or capital improvements.

(2)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  the Uintah Basin Applied Technology College may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use $1,000,000 in donations and institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a Petroleum Technology, Energy Safety, and Transportation Training Center with up to 6,500 new square feet;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the college may use state funds for operation and maintenance costs and capital improvements.

